District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2602.27

Companies to keep classified records; violations.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 4, 1922, 42 Stat. 413, ch. 93, title 10, § 27
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(q), 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 28(d), 45 DCR 745
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1427.
1973 Ed., § 35-1127.

Editor's Notes

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2602.01.